Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1331.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6123. Waiver of fee for corrected or duplicate State documents.(a) Requirements for waiver.--A person who satisfies the following requirements and does not have access to the original document the person is seeking to replace or correct is eligible for a waiver of fees under subsections (b) and (c) if either of the following apply:(1) The person has been granted relief under section 6107(b) (relating to hearings) or 6108 (relating to relief) and the relief was granted no more than 90 days prior to the person applying for a waiver under this section.123456789101112131415161718 (2) The person was the subject of abuse no earlier than the previous 120 days and the abuse is verified through one of the following methods:(i) A statement by an employee, agent or volunteer of a victim service provider, attorney, medical professional or mental health professional from whom the victim has sought assistance relating to the abuse, including the use of a standardized form under subsection (e).(ii) A statement verifying the abuse. A person who provides materially false information in the statement under this subparagraph shall be subject to a penalty of $50 plus the fee charged for the document the person sought to obtain under this section.(b) Waiver by Department of Transportation.--Upon application of a person who qualifies under subsection (a), the Department of Transportation shall waive the fee for a duplicate or corrected certificate of title, photo identification card, noncommercial driver's license, commercial driver's license, camera card, learner's permit or registration card. A qualifying person with dependents shall also receive a waiver of fee under this section for a duplicate or corrected document for the person's dependents.(c) Waiver by Department of Health.--Upon application of a person who qualifies under subsection (a), the Department of Health shall waive the fee for a certified copy of birth record. A qualifying person with dependents shall also receive a waiver of fee under this section for a duplicate or corrected document for the person's dependents.(d) Implementation by agencies.--No later than 90 days after 20260SB1331PN1721 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Transportation and the Department of Health shall:(1) establish statements of policy providing for applications made under subsection (b) or (c), as applicable;(2) make the statements of policy available on each department's publicly accessible Internet website; and(3) review the statements of policy at least every five years.(e) Forms.--The Office of Victim Advocate shall develop standardized forms for documenting abuse and providing a method for third party attestation of abuse under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1331PN1721 - 3 - 123456789101112